Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.783

[Art. 121] Larceny and wrongful appropriation.

(1) Any person subject to this code who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or of any other person any money, personal property, or article of value of any kind:

(a) With intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his [or her] own use or the use of any person other than the owner, steals that property and is guilty of larceny; or

(b) With intent temporarily to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his [or her] own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of wrongful appropriation.

(2) Any person found guilty of larceny or wrongful appropriation shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 117. Formerly RCW 38.38.792.]